Louisiana, session 2026, HB593.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:429(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§429. Office of motor vehicles field offices; authorization of fees
A.(1) The governing authority of any local governmental subdivision is
hereby authorized to levy, by resolution, a fee for each service or transaction carried
out as an operation of an office of motor vehicles field office that is not fully funded
by the state. Except as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, the The fee shall
not exceed four eight dollars and fifty cents per service or transaction and shall be
used solely to defray the cost of operations of that local field office, including but not
limited to facility rental, utilities, and maintenance. The fee shall not be charged for
the procurement or renewal of a motor vehicle registration license.
(2) The fee provided for in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall not apply
to the office of motor vehicles field offices located in Shreveport, Louisiana. may be
levied in an amount not to exceed six dollars by the local governing authority of the
parishes of Orleans, Jefferson, and Calcasieu.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 593 ENROLLED
(3) The fee provided for in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection may be levied
in an amount not to exceed eight dollars by the local governing authority of the city
of West Monroe.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.